Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 29 Surveyors and Engineers

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to architects generally, see §§

33-4-101

to

33-4-117

.

As to exemption of surveyors and engineers from provisions as to architects, see §

33-4-111

.

As to penalty for changing corners, monuments, etc., see §

6-3-202

.

As to state engineer, see §§

9-1-901

to

9-1-909

.

As to preparation of survey and map by land surveyor in connection with incorporation of town, see §

15-1-202

.

As to location of uncertain boundaries of city or town by survey or perambulation, see §§

15-1-413

,

15-1-414

.

As to survey by competent surveyor in connection with addition to city or town, see §

15-1-415

.

As to city engineers, see §

15-3-212

.

As to appointment of civil engineer in city operating under commission form of government, see §

15-4-104

.

As to appointment of city engineer in city operating under city manager form of government, see §

15-4-206

.

As to appointment of surveyor in county boundary dispute proceedings, see §

18-1-405

.

As to county surveyors, see §§

18-3-102

,

18-3-701

to

18-3-705

.

As to appointment of engineers for sanitary and improvement districts, see §

35-3-105

.

As to survey and platting of cemetery grounds, see §

35-8-101

.

As to use of engineers by commissioner of public lands in connection with reclamation of land under Carey Act, see §

36-7-304

.

As to chief engineer of water conservancy district, see §

41-3-743

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements, 82 ALR2d 1013.

Right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he was not licensed in the latter state, 32 ALR3d 1151.

Revocation or suspension of license of professional engineer, 64 ALR3d 509.

§§ 33-29-101 through 33-29-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 169, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to board of registration for professional engineers and professional land surveyors, certificates and registration, see §§ 33-29-114 through 33-29-139.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 149, §§ 1 through 8, 12 and 13, related to board of examining engineers, and registration.

Section

33-29-101

was also amended by Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1. This amendment was not given effect due to the 1987 repeal of this section.

§ 33-29-111.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 33-29-139 by Laws 1987, ch. 169, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provision relating to filing of maps and plats, see § 33-29-139.

§§ 33-29-112 and 33-29-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 169, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to exemptions and limitations, and to violations, see §§ 33-29-136 and 33-29-137, respectively.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 149, §§ 9 and 11, related to prohibited acts and exceptions to application of the act.

§§ 33-29-140 through 33-29-149.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

by Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered this section as §

33-29-901

.